Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. In General

§ 37-3-101.
Rates to be just, reasonable and uniform; exceptions.

All rates shall be just and reasonable, and all unjust and unreasonable rates are prohibited. A rate shall not be considered unjust or unreasonable on the basis that it is innovative in form or in substance, that it takes into consideration competitive marketplace elements or that it provides for incentives to a public utility. Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

15-7-407

, no public utility shall in any manner charge, demand, collect or receive from any person greater or less or different compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered by the public utility than is charged, demanded, collected or received by the public utility from any other person for a like and contemporaneous service under similar circumstances and conditions. The commission may determine that rates for the same service may vary depending on cost, the competitive marketplace, the need for universally available and affordable service, the need for contribution to the joint and common costs of the public utility, volume and other discounts, and other reasonable business practices. Nothing in this title shall prohibit any public utility from furnishing free or reduced rate service to its current or pensioned employees and dependent family members under rates approved by the commission.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 27; C.S. 1920, § 5479; R.S. 1931, § 94-127; C.S. 1945, § 64-201; W.S. 1957, § 37-51; Laws 1980, ch. 43, § 1; 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to matters to be considered in fixing rates, see §§

37-2-119

,

37-2-122

.

As to authority of commission to change rates, see §

37-2-121

.

As to penalty for accepting money or other valuable consideration as rebate or offset against regular charge for services as fixed by the schedule of rates in connection with public utilities, see §

37-12-209

.

For regulation of natural gas, see chapter 5 of this title.

Commission's role in case of sale of power company's assets

was to ensure that the sale did not result in unjust or unreasonable utility rates for affected consumers, and that determination was not altered by an assertion that the effectuation of the sale was in breach of a contract, because the commission has no authority to determine the rights of parties to a contract. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 784 P.2d 627,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1989).

Rates based on historical test period just and reasonable.—

Utility failed to meet its burden of showing that the rates allowed by the public service commission, based on a historical test period, were unjust or unreasonable. Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 698 P.2d 627,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 472

(Wyo. 1985).

Effect of accepting gas purchase contract for filing. —

Once the commission has accepted for filing a gas purchase contract, the cost of gas thereunder is recoverable as a matter of law through rates sufficient to pay such costs, plus the cost of the utility service, plus a reasonable rate on investment. Kerr-McGee Corp. v. Northern Utils., 500 F. Supp. 624, 1980 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9447 (D. Wyo. 1980), rev'd, 673 F.2d 323, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 20769 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Applied

in

Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983); US W. Communications, Inc. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 907 P.2d 343,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

In re N. Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1952); Northern Utils., Inc. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 617 P.2d 1079,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1980); Great W. Sugar Co. v. Johnson, 624 P.2d 1184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

Montana Dakota Utils. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 847 P.2d 978,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

McCulloch Gas Transmission Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 627 P.2d 173,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1981); Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 833 P.2d 473,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Discrimination between property within and that outside governmental districts as to public service or utility rate, 4 ALR2d 595.

Variation of utility rates based on flat and meter rates, 40 ALR2d 1331.

Discrimination as to deposit required by public utility, 43 ALR2d 1262.

Mistake of carrier as to amount of charges as precluding it from collecting lawful charges, 88 ALR2d 1375.

Validity of “fuel adjustment” or similar clauses authorizing electric utility to pass on increased cost of fuel to its customers, 83 ALR3d 933.

Advertising or promotional expenditures of public utility as part of operating expenses for ratemaking purposes, 83 ALR3d 963.

Public utilities: validity of preferential rates for elderly or low-income persons, 29 ALR4th 615.

§ 37-3-102.
Only prescribed rates to be charged.

No public utility shall directly or indirectly, by any device whatsoever, or in anywise, charge, demand, collect or receive from any person a greater or less or different compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered by such public utility than that prescribed in the schedules of such public utility then filed and published in the manner provided in this act, nor shall any person receive or accept any service from a public utility for a compensation greater, less or in any way different from that prescribed in such schedules.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 28; C.S. 1920, § 5480; R.S. 1931, § 94-128; C.S. 1945, § 64-202; W.S. 1957, § 37-52.

Cross references. —

See cross references to §

37-3-101

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Filed rate doctrine not violated.

Wyoming Public Service Commission's order requiring the utilities company to refund overcharged amounts did not violate the filed rate doctrine where the Commission was not ordering the company to charge unapproved rates, but was requiring the company to conform, belatedly, to the approved rates. Montana-Dakota Utils., Co. v. Wyo. PSC, 2014 WY 106, 332 P.3d 1160,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Kerr-McGee Corp. v. Northern Util., Inc., 500 F. Supp. 624, 1980 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9447 (D. Wyo. 1980).

Stated

in

Northern Utils., Inc. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 617 P.2d 1079,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1980); US W. Communications, Inc. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 907 P.2d 343,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§§ 37-3-103 and 37-3-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1915, ch. 146, §§ 29 and 30, related to rates not to be reduced for persons providing facilities and renting facilities by utilities not being prohibited and the prohibition of preferences as to rates, respectively.

§ 37-3-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 104.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 31, related to free or reduced rates of transportation to certain classes of persons authorized.

Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 401, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.

§ 37-3-106.
Temporary suspension of rates; burden of proof; notice of rate changes; bonding; refunding of amounts collected in excess of final rates.

At any hearing as provided in this act involving an increase in rates or charges sought by a public utility, the burden of proof to show that the increased rate or charge is just and reasonable shall be upon the utility.

Unless the commission otherwise orders, no public utility shall make any change in any rate which has been duly established except after thirty (30) days notice to the commission, which notice shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the rates then in force, and the time when the changed rates will go into effect. The utility shall also give such notice of the proposed changes to other interested persons as the commission in its discretion may direct. All proposed changes shall be shown by filing new tariffs which shall be kept open to public inspection. When the commission establishes any rate which is innovative in form or substance, takes into consideration competitive marketplace elements or provides for incentives to a public utility, the rate may contain any provision for subsequent notice or the absence thereof which is supported by the public interest.

Whenever there is filed with the commission by any public utility any application or tariff proposing a new rate or rates, the commission may, either upon complaint or upon its own initiative, initiate an investigation, hearing, or both, concerning the lawfulness of such rate or rates. Pending its decision thereon, the commission may suspend such rate or rates, before they become effective but not for a longer initial period than six (6) months beyond the time when such rate or rates would otherwise go into effect. If the commission shall thereafter find that a longer time will be required, the commission may extend the period of suspension for an additional period or periods not exceeding in the aggregate, three (3) months.

The public utility may file an application requesting, and the commission may order such suspended rate or rates or any portion thereof to be put into effect at any time, in which event the commission may require a bond which shall secure a refund to persons entitled thereto of the amount, if any, finally determined to be excessive. The application and the bond in terms, amount and sureties shall be subject to the commission’s approval.

As ordered by the commission, the utility shall promptly refund to persons entitled thereto all amounts collected by it in excess of the final rates approved by the commission plus reasonable interest at a rate to be determined by the commission, and as ordered by the commission and upon such time and conditions as the commission shall specify, shall promptly pay all amounts not so refunded to the general fund of Wyoming.

In any case involving a proposed change in rates, the commission may permit the utility to make effective without suspension only that portion of the change which the commission may determine to be proper under the circumstances.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 32; C.S. 1920, § 5484; R.S. 1931, § 94-132; C.S. 1945, § 64-206; W.S. 1957, § 37-56; Laws 1973, ch. 228, § 1; 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Jurisdiction of agency and district court in review proceedings.—

Generally, once proceedings are instituted seeking review of an order of an administrative agency, the agency loses its jurisdiction over the matters under review, while simultaneously the district court acquires exclusive jurisdiction. Northern Utils. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 617 P.2d 1079,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1980).

Court not to usurp rate-setting power. —

The court, in a hearing involving a rate increase by the utility, cannot usurp the legislative function delegated to the public service commission in setting appropriate rates, but will defer to the commission's discretion so long as the results are fair, reasonable, uniform, and not unduly discriminatory. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983).

Court not concerned with commission's methodology if resultsjust and reasonable. —

In deciding the question of whether the use of a projected test year is required in rate setting, if the end result reached by the commission complies with the “just and reasonable” standard announced in §

37-3-101

, the methodology used by the commission is not a concern of the court, but is a matter encompassed within the prerogatives of the commission. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983).

Utility did not meet burden to allow additional amounts inexpense items. —

See Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 698 P.2d 627,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 472

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

McCulloch Gas Transmission Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 627 P.2d 173,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public service commission's implied authority to order refund of public utility revenues, 41 ALR5th 783.

§ 37-3-107.
Rates for joint service by public utilities.

When joint service is participated in by two or more public utilities the commission after hearing on complaint or on its own motion without complaint, may ascertain, determine, and fix for such services just and reasonable rates, which shall be charged, enforced, collected and observed by such public utilities.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 33; C.S. 1920, § 5485; R.S. 1931, § 94-133; C.S. 1945, § 64-207; W.S. 1957, § 37-57.

§ 37-3-108.
Apportionment of joint rates.

Whenever the public utilities involved shall fail to agree among themselves upon the apportionment or division of any joint rate established by the commission or ordered by the commission substituted for any joint rate found to violate any provision of this act, the commission may issue a supplemental order declaring the apportionment or division of such joint rate.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 34; C.S. 1920, § 5486; R.S. 1931, § 94-134; C.S. 1945, § 64-208; W.S. 1957, § 37-58.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

§ 37-3-109.
Investigation of interstate rates; application for relief.

The commission may investigate all existing or proposed interstate rates, where any act under such rate shall or may take place within this state. When such rates are, in the opinion of the commission, unjust, unreasonable, unjustly discriminatory, unduly preferential or otherwise, or in any respect in violation of the provisions of the act to regulate commerce or of any other act of congress or in conflict with the rules and orders of the surface transportation board or any other department of the federal government, the commission may apply for relief by petition or otherwise to the surface transportation board or to any other department of the federal government or to any court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 35; C.S. 1920, § 5487; R.S. 1931, § 94-135; C.S. 1945, § 64-209; W.S. 1957, § 37-59; 2012, ch. 84, § 103.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “surface transportation board” for “interstate commerce commission” throughout the section.

§ 37-3-110.
Schedules of rates to be filed and available to public; forms prescribed to conform to federal forms.

Within a time to be fixed by the commission, every public utility shall file with the commission, and keep open to public inspection as this commission may direct, schedules showing all rates for every service rendered or to be rendered by it. The commission may determine and prescribe the form of the schedules required by this act to be filed with the commission and kept open to public inspection and all changes therein, and change the form from time to time if it shall be found expedient; provided, however, that in respect to public utilities subject to act of congress to regulate commerce and any amendments thereof, the commission shall have such form or forms prescribed by it conform to any similar form prescribed by the surface transportation board.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 36; C.S. 1920, § 5488; R.S. 1931, § 94-136; C.S. 1945, § 64-210; W.S. 1957, § 37-60; 2012, ch. 84, § 103.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “surface transportation board” for “interstate commerce commission.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Illegal to adopt rates without filing. —

Part of the stated purpose of this section is to allow the public to inspect a public utility's filed service rates. By simply adopting landline terminating access charges without a filing under the cellular service, the public would be unable to determine the charges; this is anathema to the language and spirit of the law of this state. The rates, whether adopted from another service or not, must be filed under the pertinent service once they have been set. US West Communications v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 907 P.2d 343,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 37-3-111.
Contracts to be filed; statements of free or reduced rate service required.

Every public utility shall file with the commission copies of contracts, agreements or arrangements to which it may be a party, as the commission may designate. Every public utility shall, whenever required by the commission, file with the commission statements of passes, tickets, mileage books or franks, issued by the public utility, free or at rates lower than those open to the public in general, or of other authorization of service free or at reduced rates, these statements to cover the periods of time and classes of service, and to include information connected with the issuance thereof, as the commission may prescribe.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 37; C.S. 1920, § 5489; R.S. 1931, § 94-137; C.S. 1945, § 64-211; W.S. 1957, § 37-61; Laws 1977, ch. 116, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to free or reduced rates of transportation, see §

37-3-105

.

Quoted

in

Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978); Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974); Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-3-112.
Service to be adequate and safe; regulations to be just and reasonable; unjust discrimination or undue preference as to service prohibited.

The service and facilities of every public utility shall be adequate and safe and every service regulation shall be just and reasonable. The commission shall have the authority to investigate, consider and determine standards for availability or reliability of service that are objectively established by rule consistent with commonly accepted industry standards. It shall be unlawful for any public utility to make or permit to exist any unjust discrimination or undue preference with respect to its service, facilities or service regulations. This provision shall not be construed as prohibiting a public utility from establishing classifications which distinguish among its various services, facilities or service regulations if the classifications are not unduly discriminatory among the customers in the same class of service.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 38; C.S. 1920, § 5490; R.S. 1931, § 94-138; C.S. 1945, § 64-212; W.S. 1957, § 37-62; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to discrimination generally with reference to trade and commerce, see §§

40-4-101

to

40-4-123

.

Stated

in

Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

For article, “The Wyoming Natural Gas Consumers' Act of 1985: An Experiment in Controlling Natural Gas Prices and a Response to Indefinite Price Escalation Clauses,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 141 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty of mutual association, nonprofit organization or cooperative to furnish utility services, 56 ALR2d 413.

Liability of one other than electric power or light company or its employee for interruption, failure, or inadequacy of electric power, 15 ALR4th 1148.

Liability of telephone company for mistakes in or omissions from its directory, 47 ALR4th 882.

Liability of electric utility to nonpatron for interruption or failure of power, 54 ALR4th 667.

Propriety of refusal of airline to transport passenger or property under § 1111(a) of Federal Aviation Act of 1958 (49 U.S.C. Appx § 1511(a)), 75 ALR Fed 212.

Propriety, under 49 U.S.C. § 10903(a), of interstate commerce commission's decision permitting railroad to abandon line or discontinue service, 77 ALR Fed 231.

Debtor's protection under 11 U.S.C. § 366 against utility service cutoff, 83 ALR Fed 207.

Construction and application of § 105 Airline Deregulation Act (49 U.S.C. § 41713), pertaining to preemption of authority over prices, routes, and services, 149 ALR Fed 299.

§ 37-3-113.
Interchange and transfer of messages, service and other facilities.

Every public utility shall afford all reasonable, proper and equal facilities for the prompt and efficient interchange and transfer of passengers, property, cars loaded or empty, messages, service, or other facilities between the lines, plants or systems owned, operated, controlled or leased by it, and the lines, plants or systems of every other public utility, and shall make such interchange and transfer promptly without discrimination between shippers, passengers, carriers and all persons either as to compensation charged, service and facilities rendered or afforded. Every public utility operating within the state shall receive and transmit without delay or discrimination, any message, service, passenger or property or facility of or from every other similar public utility with whose line or plant or system a physical connection may have been made. But this act shall not be construed as requiring any public utility to give the use of its tracks or terminal facilities to another public utility engaged in like business.

Nothing in this section contained shall be construed as in anywise limiting or modifying the duty of a public utility to establish joint rates, fares and charges for the transportation of passengers, property, messages, service or other facilities over the lines, plants or systems owned, operated, controlled or leased by it and the lines, plants or systems of other similar public utility, nor as in any manner limiting or modifying the power of the commission to require the establishment of such joint rates, fares and charges, such public utilities have failed to agree upon such use or the terms or conditions of compensation for the same, the commission may by order direct that such use may be permitted, and prescribe a reasonable compensation and reasonable terms and conditions for such joint use. Said commission however, shall not direct or sanction such joint use except in case of clear necessity.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 39; C.S. 1920, § 5491; R.S. 1931, § 94-139; C.S. 1945, § 64-213; W.S. 1957, § 37-63.

Cross references. —

As to consolidation of railroads, see §§

37-9-102

to

37-9-104

.

Editor's notes. —

Paragraph (b) of this section is set out exactly as it appears in the printed act.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of telegraph or telephone company for transmitting or permitting transmission of libelous or slanderous messages, 91 ALR3d 1015.

§ 37-3-114.
Safety standards.

All instrumentalities, equipment, plant and facilities furnished, employed or used by any public utility, shall in all respects be adequate and efficient, and the construction, operation and use thereof, shall be such as shall prevent injury to property, and as shall promote the safety, health, comfort, and convenience of its patrons, employees and the public, and to this end, the commission may make rules and regulations governing the construction, maintenance and operation of telephone, telegraph, trolley, electric light and power lines hereafter built within this state, and shall by rule adopt as the standard of such construction, operation and maintenance the provisions of the current edition of the National Electrical Safety Code; provided that when electric light and power lines use Y-connected circuits with neutral conductors effectively grounded throughout their length, minimum vertical clearance of wires or neutral conductors over ground or rails shall be determined by the voltage between wires and ground, if such voltage does not exceed fifteen thousand (15,000) volts. Said commission shall also have the power to direct the manner by which all utilities shall cross public highways and other utilities and by which public highways shall cross the utilities and to prescribe methods of approach and crossing that shall secure safety to the public; provided, however, that with respect to approaches and crossings of overhead lines, the provisions of the current edition of the National Electrical Safety Code above prescribed shall apply, except as provided herein with respect to Y-connected circuits with neutral conductors effectively grounded throughout their length where the voltage does not exceed fifteen thousand (15,000) volts. At every such crossing, in case the persons interested do not themselves agree, it shall be the duty of the commission to apportion between the parties, in accordance with justice, the costs and expenses of installing and maintaining such crossings. In case expense is apportioned to be paid by a public highway the portion so to be paid by such highway shall be paid by the city or town in case the crossing line is within the boundaries of a city or town, and by the county in which the crossing is situated in case the same is not within any city or town. Provided that all such equipment, plant, and facilities shall be maintained in such working condition that will provide a minimum of interference with radio and television reception to residents and highway users in the immediate area of such equipment, plant, and facilities.

This section shall not be construed as creating neither prohibition nor obligation or duty of inspection or maintenance by an electric or telecommunications public utility for facilities or equipment not owned by the public utility.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 40; C.S. 1920, § 5492; R.S. 1931, § 94-140; C.S. 1945, § 64-214; Laws 1947, ch. 127, § 1; 1955, ch. 214, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-64; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Applied

in

Public Serv. Comm'n v. Formal Complaint of WWZ Co., 641 P.2d 183,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

Furman v. Rural Elec. Co., 869 P.2d 136,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Blumenthal v. City of Cheyenne, 64 Wyo. 75, 186 P.2d 556,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1947); Wyrulec Co. v. Schutt, 866 P.2d 756,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury of children on electric transmission tower or pole, 6 ALR2d 754.

Discontinuing service to premises, duty of gas company as regards precautions to be taken upon or after, 13 ALR2d 1396.

Liability for injury or death occurring from defects in, or negligence in construction, operation, or maintenance of electric street-lighting equipment, apparatus, and the like, 19 ALR2d 344.

Lightning transmitted on wires, liability of electric power or telephone company for injury or damage by, 25 ALR2d 722.

Defects in service lines on consumer's premises, liability of gas company for injury or damage due to, 26 ALR2d 136.

Liability of electric company to one other than employee, arising from its failure to shut off current, 32 ALR2d 244.

Adult's intentional bodily contact with electrified wire as contributory negligence, 34 ALR2d 98.

Liability for injury or death of adult from electric wires passing through or near trees, 40 ALR2d 1299.

Validity, construction, and effect of statute, ordinance, or other measure involving chemical treatment of public water supply, 43 ALR2d 453.

Liability of owner of wires, poles, or structures struck by airplane for resulting injury or damage, 48 ALR2d 1462.

Admissibility of evidence as to experiments or tests in civil action for death, injury, or property damage against electric power company or the like, 54 ALR2d 922.

Liability for injury or death from electrification of guy wire, 55 ALR2d 129.

Validity of prohibition or regulation of bathing, swimming, boating, fishing, or the like, to protect public water supply, 56 ALR2d 790.

Liability of electric power company for injury or death resulting from contact of crane, derrick, or other movable machine with electric line, 69 ALR2d 93.

Interference with wires, poles or utilities as affected by statute or other regulation affecting the moving of buildings on highways, 83 ALR2d 464.

Liability of electric power company for personal injury or death from fall of pole, 97 ALR2d 664.

Liability of water distributor for damage caused by water escaping from main, 20 ALR3d 1294.

Water distributor's liability for injury due to condition of service lines, meters and the like, which serve individual consumer, 20 ALR3d 1363.

Status of injured adult as trespasser on land not owned by electricity supplier, as affecting its liability for injuries inflicted upon him by electric wires it maintains thereon, 30 ALR3d 777.

Liability of one selling or distributing liquid or bottled fuel gas, for personal injury, death, or property damage, 41 ALR3d 782.

Applicability of rule of strict or absolute liability to overflow or escape of water caused by dam failure, 51 ALR3d 965.

Liability of water supplier for damages resulting from furnishing impure water, 54 ALR3d 936.

Admissibility in evidence, on issue of negligence, of codes or standards of safety issued or sponsored by governmental body or by voluntary association, 58 ALR3d 148.

Liability for injury to or death of child from electric wire encountered while climbing tree, 91 ALR3d 616.

Liability of telephone company for injury by noise or electric charge transmitted over line, 99 ALR3d 628.

Products liability: electricity, 60 ALR4th 732.

Liability for injury or death from collision with guy wire, 8 ALR5th 177.

Res ipsa loquitur in gas leak cases, 34 ALR5th 1.

§ 37-3-115.
Rates; less expensive source of supply.

In the case of a utility furnishing natural gas, if the utility decreases its cost of natural gas, not less than ninety percent (90%) of the decrease in the cost shall be passed on to the consumer and in addition to other factors allowed by the commission in setting rates the commission may allow the utility to add to its rate not more than ten percent (10%) of the difference between its previous cost for natural gas and its new cost for natural gas.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 45, § 1.

Commission empowered to reduce incentive award. —

In line with its continuing jurisdiction and the statutory duty to maintain rates which are just and reasonable, the commission necessarily has the “implied or incidental” authority to reduce an incentive award previously granted under this section. The commission's continuing jurisdiction gives it the authority to adjust an incentive award, either up or down, after the original grant, so long as the incentive award remains between zero and 10 percent of the savings and it is just and reasonable. Montana-Dakota Utils. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 746 P.2d 1272,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1987).

Commission can adjust incentive award in pass-on proceeding

instead of during a full-rate case proceeding. Montana-Dakota Utils. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 746 P.2d 1272,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 37-3-116.
Electric utility service agreements.

An electric utility may enter into a service agreement as specified in subsection (d) of this section, provided that the terms and conditions of the agreement:

Are expected to result in revenue to the utility in an amount that exceeds the expected cost to serve the customer’s projected electric usage;

Shall not result in obligating other customers for any utility investments or any direct, indirect or reasonably assigned costs related to the utility’s service to the customer under the agreement. For purposes of this paragraph, investments and costs include known or reasonably ascertainable expenses for power supply, electric transmission and distribution and administrative, general, financial and other costs related to the agreement;

Provide benefits to other customers without imposing additional current or future costs.

An electric utility shall retain for its owners any profits or losses that result from entering into an agreement with a customer pursuant to this section.

Regulated utilities entering into agreements under this section shall report to the commission at least once every three (3) years as to the impacts on other rate payers.

This section shall only apply to service agreements:

Between an electric utility and a customer with projected electric usage greater than five (5) megawatts;

For services provided under a tariff approved by the commission consistent with its authority under W.S.

37-2-121

.

History.

2019 ch. 160, § 1, effective February 28, 2019; 2019 ch. 186, § 4(c), effective March 8, 2019.

Applicability

Laws 2019, ch. 160 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.